lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 7858 Y 2
SFX 7858 imti ima/481 . 337
SFX 7858 imtis imasi/481 . 337

SFX 7859 Y 2
SFX 7859 imti ima/482 . 337
SFX 7859 imtis imasi/482 . 337

SFX 7869 Y 1
SFX 7869 imti imie/483 . 337

SFX 7870 Y 1
SFX 7870 imtis imie/484 . 337

SFX 7871 Y 2
SFX 7871 imti ėmė/485 . 338
SFX 7871 imtis ėmėsi/485 . 338

SFX 7872 Y 2
SFX 7872 imti ėmė/486 . 338
SFX 7872 imtis ėmėsi/486 . 338

SFX 7873 Y 2
SFX 7873 imti ėmė/487 . 338
SFX 7873 imtis ėmėsi/487 . 338

SFX 7877 Y 2
SFX 7877 uti uti/464 . 336
SFX 7877 utis utis/464 . 336

SFX 7878 Y 2
SFX 7878 uti uti/465 . 336
SFX 7878 utis utis/465 . 336

SFX 7879 Y 2
SFX 7879 uti uti/466 . 336
SFX 7879 utis utis/466 . 336

SFX 7880 Y 2
SFX 7880 uti uti/467 . 336
SFX 7880 utis utis/467 . 336

SFX 7881 Y 2
SFX 7881 uti uti/468 . 336
SFX 7881 utis utis/468 . 336

SFX 7882 Y 2
SFX 7882 uti uti/469 . 336
SFX 7882 utis utis/469 . 336

SFX 7883 Y 2
SFX 7883 uti uti/470 . 336
SFX 7883 utis utis/470 . 336

SFX 7884 Y 2
SFX 7884 uti uti/471 . 336
SFX 7884 utis utis/471 . 336

SFX 7885 Y 2
SFX 7885 uti uti/472 . 336
SFX 7885 utis utis/472 . 336

SFX 7886 Y 2
SFX 7886 uti uti/473 . 336
SFX 7886 utis utis/473 . 336

SFX 7897 Y 2
SFX 7897 uti una/474 . 337
SFX 7897 utis unasi/474 . 337

SFX 7898 Y 2
SFX 7898 uti una/475 . 337
SFX 7898 utis unasi/475 . 337

SFX 7899 Y 2
SFX 7899 uti una/476 . 337
SFX 7899 utis unasi/476 . 337

SFX 7900 Y 2
SFX 7900 uti una/477 . 337
SFX 7900 utis unasi/477 . 337

SFX 7901 Y 2
SFX 7901 uti una/478 . 337
SFX 7901 utis unasi/478 . 337

SFX 7902 Y 2
SFX 7902 uti una/479 . 337
SFX 7902 utis unasi/479 . 337

SFX 7903 Y 2
SFX 7903 uti una/480 . 337
SFX 7903 utis unasi/480 . 337

SFX 7904 Y 2
SFX 7904 uti una/481 . 337
SFX 7904 utis unasi/481 . 337

SFX 7905 Y 2
SFX 7905 uti una/482 . 337
SFX 7905 utis unasi/482 . 337

SFX 7915 Y 1
SFX 7915 uti unie/483 . 337

SFX 7916 Y 1
SFX 7916 utis unie/484 . 337

SFX 7917 Y 2
SFX 7917 uti vo/485 . 338
SFX 7917 utis vosi/485 . 338

SFX 7918 Y 2
SFX 7918 uti vo/486 . 338
SFX 7918 utis vosi/486 . 338

SFX 7919 Y 2
SFX 7919 uti vo/487 . 338
SFX 7919 utis vosi/487 . 338

SFX 7923 Y 2
SFX 7923 eiti eiti/464 . 336
SFX 7923 eitis eitis/464 . 336

SFX 7924 Y 2
SFX 7924 eiti eiti/465 . 336
SFX 7924 eitis eitis/465 . 336

SFX 7925 Y 2
SFX 7925 eiti eiti/466 . 336
SFX 7925 eitis eitis/466 . 336

SFX 7926 Y 2
SFX 7926 eiti eiti/467 . 336
SFX 7926 eitis eitis/467 . 336

SFX 7927 Y 2
SFX 7927 eiti eiti/468 . 336
SFX 7927 eitis eitis/468 . 336

SFX 7928 Y 2
SFX 7928 eiti eiti/469 . 336
SFX 7928 eitis eitis/469 . 336

SFX 7929 Y 2
SFX 7929 eiti eiti/470 . 336
SFX 7929 eitis eitis/470 . 336

SFX 7930 Y 2
SFX 7930 eiti eiti/471 . 336
SFX 7930 eitis eitis/471 . 336

SFX 7931 Y 2
SFX 7931 eiti eiti/472 . 336
SFX 7931 eitis eitis/472 . 336

SFX 7932 Y 2
SFX 7932 eiti eiti/473 . 336
SFX 7932 eitis eitis/473 . 336

SFX 7943 Y 2
SFX 7943 eiti eina/474 . 337
SFX 7943 eitis einasi/474 . 337

SFX 7944 Y 2
SFX 7944 eiti eina/475 . 337
SFX 7944 eitis einasi/475 . 337

SFX 7945 Y 2
SFX 7945 eiti eina/476 . 337
SFX 7945 eitis einasi/476 . 337

SFX 7946 Y 2
SFX 7946 eiti eina/477 . 337
SFX 7946 eitis einasi/477 . 337

SFX 7947 Y 2
SFX 7947 eiti eina/478 . 337
SFX 7947 eitis einasi/478 . 337

SFX 7948 Y 2
SFX 7948 eiti eina/479 . 337
SFX 7948 eitis einasi/479 . 337

SFX 7949 Y 2
SFX 7949 eiti eina/480 . 337
SFX 7949 eitis einasi/480 . 337

SFX 7950 Y 2
SFX 7950 eiti eina/481 . 337
SFX 7950 eitis einasi/481 . 337

SFX 7951 Y 2
SFX 7951 eiti eina/482 . 337
SFX 7951 eitis einasi/482 . 337

SFX 7961 Y 1
SFX 7961 eiti einie/483 . 337

SFX 7962 Y 1
SFX 7962 eitis einie/484 . 337

SFX 7963 Y 2
SFX 7963 eiti ėjo/485 . 338
SFX 7963 eitis ėjosi/485 . 338

SFX 7964 Y 2
SFX 7964 eiti ėjo/486 . 338
SFX 7964 eitis ėjosi/486 . 338

SFX 7965 Y 2
SFX 7965 eiti ėjo/487 . 338
SFX 7965 eitis ėjosi/487 . 338

SFX 7969 Y 1
SFX 7969 eiti eiti/464 . 336

SFX 7970 Y 1
SFX 7970 eiti eiti/465 . 336

SFX 7971 Y 1
SFX 7971 eiti eiti/466 . 336

SFX 7972 Y 1
SFX 7972 eiti eiti/467 . 336

SFX 7973 Y 1
SFX 7973 eiti eiti/468 . 336

SFX 7974 Y 1
SFX 7974 eiti eiti/469 . 336

SFX 7975 Y 1
SFX 7975 eiti eiti/470 . 336

SFX 7976 Y 1
SFX 7976 eiti eiti/471 . 336

SFX 7977 Y 1
SFX 7977 eiti eiti/472 . 336

SFX 7978 Y 1
SFX 7978 eiti eiti/473 . 336

SFX 7979 Y 1
SFX 7979 eiti eiti/495 . 336

SFX 7980 Y 1
SFX 7980 eiti eina/474 . 337

SFX 7981 Y 1
SFX 7981 eiti eina/475 . 337

SFX 7982 Y 1
SFX 7982 eiti eina/476 . 337

SFX 7983 Y 1
SFX 7983 eiti eina/477 . 337

SFX 7984 Y 1
SFX 7984 eiti eina/478 . 337

SFX 7985 Y 1
SFX 7985 eiti eina/479 . 337

SFX 7986 Y 1
SFX 7986 eiti eina/480 . 337

SFX 7987 Y 1
SFX 7987 eiti eina/481 . 337

SFX 7988 Y 1
SFX 7988 eiti eina/482 . 337

SFX 7989 Y 1
SFX 7989 eiti einie/483 . 337

SFX 7990 Y 1
SFX 7990 eiti ėjo/485 . 338

SFX 7991 Y 1
SFX 7991 eiti ėjo/486 . 338

SFX 7992 Y 1
SFX 7992 eiti ėjo/487 . 338

SFX 7993 Y 2
SFX 7993 ėbti ėbti/464 . 336
SFX 7993 ėbtis ėbtis/464 . 336

SFX 7994 Y 2
SFX 7994 ėbti ėbti/465 . 336
SFX 7994 ėbtis ėbtis/465 . 336

SFX 7995 Y 2
SFX 7995 ėbti ėbti/466 . 336
SFX 7995 ėbtis ėbtis/466 . 336

SFX 7996 Y 2
SFX 7996 ėbti ėbti/467 . 336
SFX 7996 ėbtis ėbtis/467 . 336

SFX 7997 Y 2
SFX 7997 ėbti ėbti/468 . 336
SFX 7997 ėbtis ėbtis/468 . 336

SFX 7998 Y 2
SFX 7998 ėbti ėbti/469 . 336
SFX 7998 ėbtis ėbtis/469 . 336

SFX 7999 Y 2
SFX 7999 ėbti ėbti/470 . 336
SFX 7999 ėbtis ėbtis/470 . 336

SFX 8000 Y 2
SFX 8000 ėbti ėbti/471 . 336
SFX 8000 ėbtis ėbtis/471 . 336

SFX 8001 Y 2
SFX 8001 ėbti ėbti/472 . 336
SFX 8001 ėbtis ėbtis/472 . 336

SFX 8002 Y 2
SFX 8002 ėbti ėbti/473 . 336
SFX 8002 ėbtis ėbtis/473 . 336

SFX 8013 Y 2
SFX 8013 ėbti ebia/474 . 337
SFX 8013 ėbtis ebiasi/474 . 337

SFX 8014 Y 2
SFX 8014 ėbti ebia/475 . 337
SFX 8014 ėbtis ebiasi/475 . 337

SFX 8015 Y 2
SFX 8015 ėbti ebia/476 . 337
SFX 8015 ėbtis ebiasi/476 . 337

SFX 8016 Y 2
SFX 8016 ėbti ebia/477 . 337
SFX 8016 ėbtis ebiasi/477 . 337

SFX 8017 Y 2
SFX 8017 ėbti ebia/478 . 337
SFX 8017 ėbtis ebiasi/478 . 337

SFX 8018 Y 2
SFX 8018 ėbti ebia/479 . 337
SFX 8018 ėbtis ebiasi/479 . 337

SFX 8019 Y 2
SFX 8019 ėbti ebia/480 . 337
SFX 8019 ėbtis ebiasi/480 . 337

SFX 8020 Y 2
SFX 8020 ėbti ebia/481 . 337
SFX 8020 ėbtis ebiasi/481 . 337

SFX 8021 Y 2
SFX 8021 ėbti ebia/482 . 337
SFX 8021 ėbtis ebiasi/482 . 337

SFX 8031 Y 1
SFX 8031 ėbti ebie/483 . 337

SFX 8032 Y 1
SFX 8032 ėbtis ebie/484 . 337

SFX 8033 Y 2
SFX 8033 ėbti ėbė/485 . 338
SFX 8033 ėbtis ėbėsi/485 . 338

SFX 8034 Y 2
SFX 8034 ėbti ėbė/486 . 338
SFX 8034 ėbtis ėbėsi/486 . 338

SFX 8035 Y 2
SFX 8035 ėbti ėbė/487 . 338
SFX 8035 ėbtis ėbėsi/487 . 338

SFX 8039 Y 2
SFX 8039 ėsti ėsti/464 . 336
SFX 8039 ėstis ėstis/464 . 336

SFX 8040 Y 2
SFX 8040 ėsti ėsti/465 . 336
SFX 8040 ėstis ėstis/465 . 336

SFX 8041 Y 2
SFX 8041 ėsti ėsti/466 . 336
SFX 8041 ėstis ėstis/466 . 336

SFX 8042 Y 2
SFX 8042 ėsti ėsti/467 . 336
SFX 8042 ėstis ėstis/467 . 336

SFX 8043 Y 2
SFX 8043 ėsti ėsti/468 . 336
SFX 8043 ėstis ėstis/468 . 336

SFX 8044 Y 2
SFX 8044 ėsti ėsti/469 . 336
SFX 8044 ėstis ėstis/469 . 336

SFX 8045 Y 2
SFX 8045 ėsti ėsti/470 . 336
SFX 8045 ėstis ėstis/470 . 336

SFX 8046 Y 2
SFX 8046 ėsti ėsti/471 . 336
SFX 8046 ėstis ėstis/471 . 336

SFX 8047 Y 2
SFX 8047 ėsti ėsti/472 . 336
SFX 8047 ėstis ėstis/472 . 336

SFX 8048 Y 2
SFX 8048 ėsti ėsti/473 . 336
SFX 8048 ėstis ėstis/473 . 336

SFX 8059 Y 2
SFX 8059 ėsti esia/474 . 337
SFX 8059 ėstis esiasi/474 . 337

SFX 8060 Y 2
SFX 8060 ėsti esia/475 . 337
SFX 8060 ėstis esiasi/475 . 337

SFX 8061 Y 2
SFX 8061 ėsti esia/476 . 337
SFX 8061 ėstis esiasi/476 . 337

SFX 8062 Y 2
SFX 8062 ėsti esia/477 . 337
SFX 8062 ėstis esiasi/477 . 337

SFX 8063 Y 2
SFX 8063 ėsti esia/478 . 337
SFX 8063 ėstis esiasi/478 . 337

SFX 8064 Y 2
SFX 8064 ėsti esia/479 . 337
SFX 8064 ėstis esiasi/479 . 337

SFX 8065 Y 2
SFX 8065 ėsti esia/480 . 337
SFX 8065 ėstis esiasi/480 . 337

SFX 8066 Y 2
SFX 8066 ėsti esia/481 . 337
SFX 8066 ėstis esiasi/481 . 337

SFX 8067 Y 2
SFX 8067 ėsti esia/482 . 337
SFX 8067 ėstis esiasi/482 . 337

AF 7993,7994,8013,8033,65521 # 122
AF 7923,7924,7943,7963,65521 # 129
AF 7877,7878,7897,7917,65521 # 131
AF 7831,7832,7851,7871,65521 # 150
AF 7923,7924,7943,7961,7962,7963,65521 # 219
AF 8039,8040,8059,8079,65521 # 294
AF 7969,7970,7979,7980,7989,7990,65521 # 298
