lt-LT_morphology.dic
ateiti/219	11
atgauti/131	11
atimti/150	11
atsidrėbti/122	13
beateiti/129	11
beatsigauti/131	13
beišeiti/129	11
bepaeiti/129	11
bepagauti/131	11
bepriimti/150	11
beužimti/150	11
drėbti/122	11
drėbtis/122	13
dvėsti/294	11
eiti/298	11
eitis/129	13
gauti/131	11
grėsti/294	11
įdrėbti/122	11
įgauti/131	11
įimti/150	11
imtis/150	13
įsidrėbti/122	13
išdrėbti/122	11
išdvėsti/294	11
išeiti/129	11
išgauti/131	11
išsidrėbti/122	13
išsiimti/150	13
išsisrėbti/122	13
išsrėbti/122	11
neapdrėbti/122	33
neapgauti/131	33
neapsieiti/129	34
neapsiimti/150	34
neatgauti/131	33
neatsieiti/129	34
neatsiimti/150	34
nebeapgauti/131	33
nebeapsiimti/150	34
nebeatgauti/131	33
nebeatsieiti/129	34
nebeatsiimti/150	34
nebedvėsti/294	33
nebegauti/131	33
nebegrėsti/294	33
nebeišgauti/131	33
nebeišsrėbti/122	33
nebeiti/129	33
nebenusiimti/150	34
nebepereiti/129	33
nebeprigauti/131	33
nebepriimti/150	33
nebesrėbti/122	33
nebesugauti/131	33
nebesusieiti/129	34
nebeužimti/150	33
nedvėsti/294	33
negauti/131	33
negrėsti/294	33
neįdrėbti/122	33
neišdvėsti/294	33
neišeiti/129	33
neišgauti/131	33
neišsidrėbti/122	34
neišsiimti/150	34
nenudrėbti/122	33
nenudvėsti/294	33
nepadvėsti/294	33
nepagauti/131	33
nepareiti/129	33
nepasiimti/150	34
nepasrėbti/122	33
neprieiti/129	33
neprigauti/131	33
nepriimti/150	33
nesigauti/131	34
nesrėbti/122	33
nesusieiti/129	34
nesusigauti/131	34
nesusiimti/150	34
neužsidrėbti/122	34
nudvėsti/294	11
nusidrėbti/122	13
nusiimti/150	13
padvėsti/294	11
pagauti/131	11
pareiti/129	11
pasrėbti/122	11
persiimti/150	13
pridvėsti/294	11
prieiti/129	11
prigauti/131	11
prisisrėbti/122	13
srėbti/122	11
sudrėbti/122	11
suimti/150	11
teapeiti/129	11
teatgauti/131	11
teatimti/150	11
tebeeiti/129	11
tebegrėsti/294	11
tebeprieiti/129	11
tebepriimti/150	11
tebesrėbti/122	11
tedvėsti/294	11
tegauti/131	11
tegrėsti/294	11
teišimti/150	11
teneišeiti/129	11
teneužsigauti/131	13
tepaeiti/129	11
tepasiimti/150	13
teprieiti/129	11
tesuimti/150	11
teužgauti/131	11
užsidrėbti/122	13
užsiimti/150	13
daeiti/129	57
